Hawaii statutes.
[§145-24] Authorization to inspect.
Every law enforcement officer or other officer or employee as described in
section 145-25 having probable cause to believe that the possession, sale, or
transportation of agricultural commodities is unlawful, may take reasonable
steps to detain the person having possession, selling, or transporting the
agricultural commodities and request from the person being detained proof of
ownership of the commodities. [L 1999, c 186, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next